lexc/verb/enhuigefo.lexc
LEXICON Case71
+IndefSg1:^+cIndefSg1^§igeou§k    #;    ! ek/ok
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§szorelol§ #;    ! esz, el/ol
+IndefSg3:^+cIndefSg3^           #;    !
+IndefPl1:^+cIndefPl1^§igeu§nk   #;    ! ünk/unk
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^§igeoe§t§igeoe§k  #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^§igea§n§igea§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+DefSg1:^+cDefSg1^§igeou§m        #;    ! em/om
+DefSg2:^+cDefSg2^§igeou§d        #;    ! ed/od
+DefSg3:^+cDefSg3^§igeija1§       #;    ! i/sa
+DefPl1:^+cDefPl1^§j§§igeu§k      #;    ! jük/suk
+DefPl2:^+cDefPl2^§igejatokitek1§ #;    ! itek/sátok
+DefPl3:^+cDefPl3^§igejakik1§     #;    ! ik/sák
+ConjIndefSg1:^+cConjIndefSg1^§sj1§§igea§k     #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj1§§igeaa§l    #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§ék          #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj1§           #;
+ConjIndefSg3:^+cConjIndefSg3^§sj1§§igeoe§n     #;
+ConjIndefPl1:^+cConjIndefPl1^§sj1§§igeu§nk    #;
+ConjIndefPl2:^+cConjIndefPl2^§sj1§§igea§t§igeoe§k       #;
+ConjIndefPl3:^+cConjIndefPl3^§sj1§§igea§n§igea§k      #;
+ConjDefSg1:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj1§§igea§m         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^§sj1§§igea§d         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^§sj1§d              #;
+ConjDefSg3:^+cConjDefSg3^§sj1§§igea§          #;
+ConjDefPl1:^+cConjDefPl1^§sj1§§igeu§k         #;
+ConjDefPl2:^+cConjDefPl2^§sj1§§igeaa§t§igeoe§k     #;
+ConjDefPl3:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj1§§igeaa§k            #;
+PastIndefSg1:^+cPIndefSg1^§igea§tt§AA§m            #;    ! tem/tam
+PastIndefSg2:^+cPIndefSg2^§igea§tt§igeaa§l         #;    ! tál/tél
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§igea§tt      #;    ! t
+PastIndefPl1:^+cPIndefPl1^§igea§tt§igeu§nk         #;    ! tünk/tunk
+PastIndefPl2:^+cPIndefPl2^§igea§tt§igea§t§igeoe§k  #;    ! tetek/tatok
+PastIndefPl3:^+cPIndefPl3^§igea§tt§igea§k          #;    ! tek/tak
+PastDefSg1:^+cPDefSg1^§igea§tt§igea§m              #;    ! tem/tam
+PastDefSg2:^+cPDefSg2^§igea§tt§igea§d              #;    ! tad/ted
+PastDefSg3:^+cPDefSg3^§igea§tt§igea§               #;    ! ta/te
+PastDefPl1:^+cPDefPl1^§igea§tt§igeu§k              #;    ! tuk/tük
+PastDefPl2:^+cPDefPl2^§igea§tt§igeaa§t§igeoe§k     #;    ! tátok/tétek
+PastDefPl3:^+cPDefPl3^§igea§tt§igeaa§k             #;    ! ták/ték
+CondIndefSg1:^+cCIndefSg1^§igeoe§nék               #;    ! nék
+CondIndefSg2:^+cCIndefSg2^§igeoe§n§igeaa§l         #;    ! nál/nél
+CondIndefSg3:^+cCIndefSg3^§igeoe§n§igea§           #;    ! na/ne
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^§igeoe§n§igeaa§nk            #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^§igeoe§n§igeoo§k #;
+CondIndefPl2:^+cCIndefPl2^§igeoe§n§igeaa§t§igeoe§k      #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondIndefPl3:^+cCIndefPl3^§igeoe§n§igeaa§n§igea§k      #;    ! nának/nének
+CondDefSg1:^+cCDefSg1^§igeoe§n§igeaa§m                 #;    ! nám/ném
+CondDefSg2:^+cCDefSg2^§igeoe§n§igeaa§d                 #;    ! nád/néd
+CondDefSg3:^+cCDefSg3^§igeoe§n§igeaa§                  #;    ! ná/né
+CondDefPl1:^+cCDefPl1^§igeoe§n§igeaa§nk                #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondDefPl2:^+cCDefPl2^§igeoe§n§igeaa§t§igeoe§k          #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondDefPl3:^+cCDefPl3^§igeoe§n§igeaa§k                 #;    ! nák/nék
+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§l§§igea§k           #;    !
+ConjDefSg12:^+cConjDefSgp12^§sj1§§igea§l§igea§k          #;
+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^§igea§tt§igea§l§igea§k               #;    ! ta/te
+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^§igeoe§n§igeaa§l§igea§k                  #;    ! ná/né

LEXICON Case8
+IndefSg1:^+cIndefSg1^§igeo§k    #;    ! ek/ok
!+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§szorelol§ #;    ! esz, el/ol
!+IndefSg3:^+cIndefSg3^           #;    !
+IndefPl1:^+cIndefPl1^§igeu§nk   #;    ! ünk/unk
!+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^t§igeoe§k  #;    ! tek/tok
!+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^n§igea§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+DefSg1:^+cDefSg1^§igeo§m        #;    ! em/om
+DefSg2:^+cDefSg2^§igeo§d        #;    ! ed/od
+DefSg3:^+cDefSg3^§igeija1§       #;    ! i/sa
!+DefPl1:^+cDefPl1^§j§§igeu§k      #;    ! jük/suk
+DefPl2:^+cDefPl2^§igejatokitek1§ #;    ! itek/sátok
+DefPl3:^+cDefPl3^§igejakik1§     #;    ! ik/sák
!+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§l§§igea§k           #;    !

!jön
LEXICON AddVerbjon
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Potjon;

LEXICON Potjon
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInfjon;
             Casejon1;
LEXICON AddInfjon
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeou§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeou§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeou§t§igeou§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeou§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
                  Casejon;

LEXICON Casejon
+IndefSg1:^+cIndefSg1^§igeoe§k    #;    ! ek/ok
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§szorelol§ #;    ! esz, el/ol
+IndefSg3:^+cIndefSg3^           #;    !
+IndefPl1:^+cIndefPl1^§igeu§nk   #;    ! ünk/unk
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^t§igeoe§k  #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^n§igea§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+DefSg1:^+cDefSg1^§igeoe§m        #;    ! em/om
+DefSg2:^+cDefSg2^§igeoe§d        #;    ! ed/od
+DefSg3:^+cDefSg3^§igeija1§       #;    ! i/sa
+DefPl1:^+cDefPl1^§j§§igeu§k      #;    ! jük/suk
+DefPl2:^+cDefPl2^§igejatokitek1§ #;    ! itek/sátok
+DefPl3:^+cDefPl3^§igejakik1§     #;    ! ik/sák
+ConjIndefSg1:^+cConjIndefSg1^§sj§§igea§k     #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§§igeaa§l    #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§ék          #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§           #;
+ConjIndefSg3:^+cConjIndefSg3^§sj§§igeoe§n     #;
+ConjIndefPl1:^+cConjIndefPl1^§sj§§igeu§nk    #;
+ConjIndefPl2:^+cConjIndefPl2^§sj§§igea§t§igeoe§k       #;
+ConjIndefPl3:^+cConjIndefPl3^§sj§§igea§n§igea§k      #;
+ConjDefSg1:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj§§igea§m         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^§sj§§igea§d         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^§sj§d              #;
+ConjDefSg3:^+cConjDefSg3^§sj§§igea§          #;
+ConjDefPl1:^+cConjDefPl1^§sj§§igeu§k         #;
+ConjDefPl2:^+cConjDefPl2^§sj§§igeaa§t§igeoe§k     #;
+ConjDefPl3:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj§§igeaa§k            #;
+PastIndefSg1:^+cPIndefSg1^t§AA§m            #;    ! tem/tam
+PastIndefSg2:^+cPIndefSg2^t§igeaa§l         #;    ! tál/tél
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§igeoe§tt      #;    ! t
+PastIndefPl1:^+cPIndefPl1^t§igeu§nk         #;    ! tünk/tunk
+PastIndefPl2:^+cPIndefPl2^t§igea§t§igeoe§k  #;    ! tetek/tatok
+PastIndefPl3:^+cPIndefPl3^t§igea§k          #;    ! tek/tak
+PastDefSg1:^+cPDefSg1^t§igea§m              #;    ! tem/tam
+PastDefSg2:^+cPDefSg2^t§igea§d              #;    ! tad/ted
+PastDefSg3:^+cPDefSg3^t§igea§               #;    ! ta/te
+PastDefPl1:^+cPDefPl1^t§igeu§k              #;    ! tuk/tük
+PastDefPl2:^+cPDefPl2^t§igeaa§t§igeoe§k     #;    ! tátok/tétek
+PastDefPl3:^+cPDefPl3^t§igeaa§k             #;    ! ták/ték
+CondIndefSg1:^+cCIndefSg1^nék               #;    ! nék
+CondIndefSg2:^+cCIndefSg2^n§igeaa§l         #;    ! nál/nél
+CondIndefSg3:^+cCIndefSg3^n§igea§           #;    ! na/ne
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeaa§nk            #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeoo§k #;
+CondIndefPl2:^+cCIndefPl2^n§igeaa§t§igeoe§k      #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondIndefPl3:^+cCIndefPl3^n§igeaa§n§igea§k      #;    ! nának/nének
+CondDefSg1:^+cCDefSg1^n§igeaa§m                 #;    ! nám/ném
+CondDefSg2:^+cCDefSg2^n§igeaa§d                 #;    ! nád/néd
+CondDefSg3:^+cCDefSg3^n§igeaa§                  #;    ! ná/né
+CondDefPl1:^+cCDefPl1^n§igeaa§nk                #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondDefPl2:^+cCDefPl2^n§igeaa§t§igeoe§k          #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondDefPl3:^+cCDefPl3^n§igeaa§k                 #;    ! nák/nék
+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§l§§igea§k           #;    !
+ConjDefSg12:^+cConjDefSgp12^§sj§§igea§l§igea§k          #;
+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^t§igea§l§igea§k               #;    ! ta/te
+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^n§igeaa§l§igea§k                  #;    ! ná/né

LEXICON Casejon1
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^nn§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^nn§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^nni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^nn§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^nn§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^nni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^nniök #;
+Inf:^+cInf^nni  #;
!+IndefSg1:^+cIndefSg1^§igeo§k    #;    ! ek/ok
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^ssz #;    ! esz, el/ol
+IndefSg3:^+cIndefSg3^n           #;    !
!+IndefPl1:^+cIndefPl1^§igeu§nk   #;    ! ünk/unk
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^tt§igeo2§k  #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^nn§igea§k   #;    ! nek/nak
!+DefSg1:^+cDefSg1^§igeo§m        #;    ! em/om
!+DefSg2:^+cDefSg2^§igeo§d        #;    ! ed/od
!+DefSg3:^+cDefSg3^§igeija1§       #;    ! i/sa
+DefPl1:^+cDefPl1^§j§j§igeu§k      #;    ! jük/suk
!+DefPl2:^+cDefPl2^§igejatokitek1§ #;    ! itek/sátok
!+DefPl3:^+cDefPl3^§igejakik1§     #;    ! ik/sák
+ConjIndefSg1:^+cConjIndefSg1^§sj§j§igea§k     #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§j§igeaa§l    #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§ék          #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§j           #;
+ConjIndefSg3:^+cConjIndefSg3^§sj§j§igeo§n     #;
+ConjIndefPl1:^+cConjIndefPl1^§sj§j§igeu§nk    #;
+ConjIndefPl2:^+cConjIndefPl2^§sj§j§igea§t§igeoe§k       #;
+ConjIndefPl3:^+cConjIndefPl3^§sj§j§igea§n§igea§k      #;
+ConjDefSg1:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj§j§igea§m         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^§sj§j§igea§d         #;
!+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^§sj§d              #;
+ConjDefSg3:^+cConjDefSg3^§sj§j§igea§          #;
+ConjDefPl1:^+cConjDefPl1^§sj§j§igeu§k         #;
+ConjDefPl2:^+cConjDefPl2^§sj§j§igeaa§t§igeoe§k     #;
+ConjDefPl3:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj§j§igeaa§k            #;
+PastIndefSg1:^+cPIndefSg1^tt§AA§m            #;    ! tem/tam
+PastIndefSg2:^+cPIndefSg2^tt§igeaa§l         #;    ! tál/tél
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^tt     #;    ! t
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^v§igea§     #;    ! jöve
+PastIndefPl1:^+cPIndefPl1^tt§igeu§nk         #;    ! tünk/tunk
+PastIndefPl2:^+cPIndefPl2^tt§igea§t§igeoe§k  #;    ! tetek/tatok
+PastIndefPl3:^+cPIndefPl3^tt§igea§k          #;    ! tek/tak
+PastDefSg1:^+cPDefSg1^tt§igea§m              #;    ! tem/tam
+PastDefSg2:^+cPDefSg2^tt§igea§d              #;    ! tad/ted
+PastDefSg3:^+cPDefSg3^tt§igea§               #;    ! ta/te
+PastDefPl1:^+cPDefPl1^tt§igeu§k              #;    ! tuk/tük
+PastDefPl2:^+cPDefPl2^tt§igeaa§t§igeoe§k     #;    ! tátok/tétek
+PastDefPl3:^+cPDefPl3^tt§igeaa§k             #;    ! ták/ték
+CondIndefSg1:^+cCIndefSg1^nnék               #;    ! nék
+CondIndefSg2:^+cCIndefSg2^nn§igeaa§l         #;    ! nál/nél
+CondIndefSg3:^+cCIndefSg3^nn§igea§           #;    ! na/ne
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^nn§igeaa§nk            #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^nn§igeoo§k #;
+CondIndefPl2:^+cCIndefPl2^nn§igeaa§t§igeoe§k      #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondIndefPl3:^+cCIndefPl3^nn§igeaa§n§igea§k      #;    ! nának/nének
+CondDefSg1:^+cCDefSg1^nn§igeaa§m                 #;    ! nám/ném
+CondDefSg2:^+cCDefSg2^nn§igeaa§d                 #;    ! nád/néd
+CondDefSg3:^+cCDefSg3^nn§igeaa§                  #;    ! ná/né
+CondDefPl1:^+cCDefPl1^nn§igeaa§nk                #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondDefPl2:^+cCDefPl2^nn§igeaa§t§igeoe§k          #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondDefPl3:^+cCDefPl3^nn§igeaa§k                 #;    ! nák/nék
!+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§l§§igea§k           #;    !
+ConjDefSg12:^+cConjDefSgp12^§sj§j§igea§l§igea§k          #;
+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^tt§igea§l§igea§k               #;    ! ta/te
+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^nn§igeaa§l§igea§k                  #;    ! ná/né

!jön
LEXICON AddVerbjon1
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Casejon11;

LEXICON Casejon11
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§l§§igea§k           #;    !
+IndefSg3:^+cIndefSg3^0           #;    !
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^t§igeo§k  #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^n§igea§k   #;    ! nek/nak



!jön
LEXICON AddVerbgyere
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Casegyere;

LEXICON Casegyere
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg3^gyere     #;
+ConjIndefPl1:^+cConjIndefPl1^gyerünk    #;
+ConjIndefPl2:^+cConjIndefPl2^gyertek       #;
